Maryland, session 2026, SB0672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The State Department of Education Prince George’s County government shall
develop an implementation and financing plan to expand access to high–quality early
childhood education and child care in Prince George’s County for children from birth
through 3 years.
(b) To complete the plan, the Department Prince George’s County government
shall consult with the Prince George’s County Public School System, the Prince George’s
County Council, the State Department of Education, businesses, and relevant State
agencies organizations.
(c) The plan shall include an analysis of:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0672*

SENATE BILL 672
(1) the cost to parents, the county, and the State;
(2) the workforce needs of early childhood education and child care
providers to expand access;
(3) the capacity of early childhood education and child care providers to
serve more children; and
(4) additional county and State revenue options to expand access.
(d) On or before December 1, 2026 2027, the Department county government shall
submit the plan to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly and the members of the Prince George’s County Delegation
to the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.